Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5285.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) An individual less than 18 years of age shall not use or possess a pneumatic gun outside the curtilage of the individual's dwelling unless the individual is accompanied by another individual over 18 years of age. (2) An individual who violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (3) As used in this act, "pneumatic gun" means any implement, designed as a gun, that will expel a BB or pellet by spring, gas, or air.